Illinois, session 104th, SB3819.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 7-601 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/7-601)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 7-601)7    Sec. 7-601. Required liability insurance policy. 8    (a) No person shall operate, register or maintain 9registration of, and no owner shall permit another person to 10operate, register or maintain registration of, a motor vehicle 11designed to be used on a public highway in this State unless 12the motor vehicle is covered by a liability insurance policy.13    The insurance policy shall be issued in amounts no less 14than the minimum amounts set for bodily injury or death and for 15destruction of property under Section 7-203 of this Code, and 16shall be issued in accordance with the requirements of 17Sections 143a and 143a-2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, as 18amended. No insurer other than an insurer authorized to do 19business in this State shall issue a policy pursuant to this 20Section for any vehicle subject to registration under this 21Code. Nothing herein shall deprive an insurer of any policy 22defense available at common law.23    (b) The following vehicles are exempt from the   SB3819- 2 -LRB104 20608 LNS 34099 b1requirements of this Section:2        (1) vehicles subject to the provisions of Chapters 8 3    or 18a, Article III or Section 7-609 of Chapter 7, or 4    Sections 12-606 or 12-707.01 of Chapter 12 of this Code;5        (2) vehicles required to file proof of liability 6    insurance with the Illinois Commerce Commission;7        (3) vehicles covered by a certificate of 8    self-insurance under Section 7-502 of this Code;9        (4) vehicles owned by the United States, the State of 10    Illinois, or any political subdivision, municipality or 11    local mass transit district;12        (5) implements of husbandry;13        (6) other vehicles complying with laws which require 14    them to be insured in amounts meeting or exceeding the 15    minimum amounts required under this Section; and16        (7) inoperable or stored vehicles that are not 17    operated, as defined by rules and regulations of the 18    Secretary.19    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 20Secretary of State shall waive the civil penalty imposed for 21failure to maintain required liability insurance if all of the 22following conditions are met:23        (1) The registered owner's failure to maintain 24    required liability insurance constitutes the first offense 25    for that registered owner.26        (2) The vehicle was not operated upon a public roadway   SB3819- 3 -LRB104 20608 LNS 34099 b1    during the period of noncompliance.2        (3) The registered owner was not issued a citation for 3    operating an uninsured motor vehicle during the period of 4    noncompliance.5        (4) The registered owner submits an affidavit, in a 6    form prescribed by the Secretary of State, attesting that 7    during the period of noncompliance the vehicle was 8    inoperable or stored, as defined in this subsection.9    The Secretary of State may require the registered owner to 10submit reasonable documentation to substantiate the affidavit, 11including, but not limited to, repair records, mechanic 12statements or invoices, towing receipts, storage agreements, 13photographs, or other evidence demonstrating that the vehicle 14was inoperable or stored during the period of noncompliance.15    The waiver authorized under this subsection may be granted 16only once per registered owner.17    Knowingly submitting a false affidavit or documentation 18under this subsection constitutes a violation of this Code.19    For purposes of this subsection:20    "Inoperable" means a motor vehicle that was not capable of 21safe or lawful operation upon a public highway due to 22mechanical condition and was not operated upon a public 23roadway during the period of noncompliance.24    "Stored" means a motor vehicle that was intentionally 25removed from service, not operated upon a public roadway, and 26kept off the public roadway during the period of   SB3819- 4 -LRB104 20608 LNS 34099 b1noncompliance. 2    (c) Every employee of a State agency, as that term is 3defined in the Illinois State Auditing Act, who is assigned a 4specific vehicle owned or leased by the State on an ongoing 5basis shall provide the certification described in this 6Section annually to the director or chief executive officer of 7his or her agency.8    The certification shall affirm that the employee is duly 9licensed to drive the assigned vehicle and that (i) the 10employee has liability insurance coverage extending to the 11employee when the assigned vehicle is used for other than 12official State business, or (ii) the employee has filed a bond 13with the Secretary of State as proof of financial 14responsibility, in an amount equal to, or in excess of the 15requirements stated within this Section. Upon request of the 16agency director or chief executive officer, the employee shall 17present evidence to support the certification.18    The certification shall be provided during the period July 191 through July 31 of each calendar year, or within 30 days of 20any new assignment of a vehicle on an ongoing basis, whichever 21is later.22    The employee's authorization to use the assigned vehicle 23shall automatically be rescinded upon:24        (1) the revocation or suspension of the license 25    required to drive the assigned vehicle;26        (2) the cancellation or termination for any reason of   SB3819- 5 -LRB104 20608 LNS 34099 b1    the automobile liability insurance coverage as required in 2    item (c)(i); or3        (3) the termination of the bond filed with the 4    Secretary of State.5    All State employees providing the required certification 6shall immediately notify the agency director or chief 7executive officer in the event any of these actions occur.8    All peace officers employed by a State agency who are 9primarily responsible for prevention and detection of crime 10and the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws 11of this State, and prohibited by agency rule or policy to use 12an assigned vehicle owned or leased by the State for regular 13personal or off-duty use, are exempt from the requirements of 14this Section.15    (d) No person shall operate a motor vehicle registered in 16another state upon the highways of this State unless the 17vehicle is covered by a liability insurance policy. The 18operator of the vehicle shall carry within the vehicle 19evidence of the insurance.20(Source: P.A. 100-202, eff. 1-1-18; 100-828, eff. 1-1-19.)